Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201445-920
Director; examination of licensee; powers; costs.

(1) The director
shall examine the books, accounts, and records of each licensee no more often
than annually, except as provided in section 45-921. The costs of the director
incurred in an examination shall be paid by the licensee as set forth in sections
8-605 and 8-606.

(2) The director may
accept any examination, report, or information regarding a licensee from the
Consumer Financial Protection Bureau or a foreign state agency. The director
may provide any examination, report, or information regarding a licensee to
the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau or a foreign state agency. As used
in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, foreign state agency
means any duly constituted regulatory or supervisory agency which has authority
over delayed deposit services businesses, payday lenders, or similar entities,
and which is created under the laws of any other state or any territory of
the United States, including Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust
Territory of the Pacific Islands, or the Virgin Islands, or which is operating
under the code of law for the District of Columbia.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 52;

Laws 2013, LB279, § 3.